Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-217
Supreme Court; bailiffs.

The court may also appoint not to exceed two bailiffs, who shall have power to serve any process issuing out of said court in the exercise of its original jurisdiction, and shall receive for such services the same fees as sheriffs for similar services.

Laws 1879, § 22, p. 87;

R.S.1913, § 1149;

Laws 1919, c. 13, § 1, p. 73;

Laws 1921, c. 213, § 1-A, p. 753;

C.S.1922, § 1078;

C.S.1929, § 27-230;

R.S.1943, § 24-217.

For fees of sheriff, see section 33-117.